Hawaii statutes.
[§435H-9] Effect on the prepaid
health care act. Nothing in this chapter shall in any manner diminish or
limit the consumer protections contained in or alter the provisions of chapter
393. [L 2011, c 205, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next